Louisiana, session 2026, SB185.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 1-D of Code Title IV of Title 9 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950, comprised of R.S. 9:2720.21 through 2720.23 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 1-D. TERMINATING RESTRICTIVE ENFORCEMENT
OF YOUTH SETTLEMENTS LAW
§2720.21. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Terminating
Restrictive Enforcement of Youth Settlements Law'' or "TREY'S Law''.
§2720.22. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Minor" means a person who has not attained eighteen years of age.
(2) "Nondisclosure clause" means a provision in a contract or agreement
that prohibits one or more parties to the contract or agreement from disclosing
conduct or information covered by the terms and conditions of the contract or
agreement.
(3) "Sexual abuse" means:
(a) Any sexual act or conduct constituting a crime under the laws of this
state, including a sex offense or sexual offense as defined in R.S. 15:541,
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 185 ENROLLED
regardless of whether the conduct results in a criminal charge, conviction,
adjudication, or sentence.
(b) Any sexual act or conduct constituting abuse as defined in Children's
Code Article 603, including the aiding or toleration of a minor's involvement in
any sexual act or sexual activity.
§2720.23. Nondisclosure agreements; victims of child sexual abuse; void and
unenforceable
A. A nondisclosure clause shall be void and unenforceable as against
public policy only to the extent that the nondisclosure clause prohibits the
following:
(1) A victim or alleged victim of sexual abuse against a minor from
disclosing that act of sexual abuse, or facts related to that act of sexual abuse.
(2) Any other person from disclosing facts related to sexual abuse against
a minor in support of, in furtherance of, or consistent with the right of a victim
or alleged victim to disclose under Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, nothing in this
Section shall be construed to prohibit a person, including a victim or alleged
victim of sexual abuse against a minor, from entering into a contract or
agreement that restricts the disclosure of information, including the amount or
payment terms of a settlement, by another party to the contract or agreement,
including an alleged perpetrator, provided that such restriction does not
prevent disclosure protected pursuant to Subsection A of this Section.
C. No person may enforce or attempt to enforce a nondisclosure clause
provided for in this Section, regardless of the date that the contract or
agreement containing the nondisclosure clause was entered into.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply retroactively and prospectively to
any nondisclosure clause in a contract or agreement entered into before, on, or after the
effective date of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 185 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.